District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.21

Congestion management study.

No later than September 30, 2016, the Department shall make publicly available a congestion management study that includes at a minimum:

(1)

An assessment of the current state of congestion in the District;

(2)

A collection of data, using objective criteria, that demonstrates the average commute times for District residents based on each of the following modes of transportation:

(A)

Walking;

(B)

Bicycling;

(C)

By bus; and

(D)

By driving a personal car;

(3)

Recommendations for remedying existing congestion problems in the District; and

(4)

One-year, 3-year, and 5-year plans for implementing the recommendations required by paragraph (3) of this section.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 9m
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6112, 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 6112 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).